Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-308
Gross proceeds, defined.

Gross proceeds shall mean the total possible receipts from the sale of all pickle cards in any pickle card unit.

Laws 1983, LB 259, § 7;

Laws 1984, LB 949, § 13;

R.S.Supp.,1984, § 9-140.03;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 74.